OT/feet.xfst
# for Lisa, by Tim

# useful shorthands
# x = light, l = long, c = closed, s = super, i.e. long and closed
# caps = stressed
define usyll [x|l|c|s|r|d|m|t] ;
define ssyll [X|L|C|S|R|D|M|T] ;
define syll  [usyll | ssyll];

# randomly insert brackets

define left  [..] (->) "(" || _ syll ;
define right [..] (->) ")" || syll _ ;

# throw out forms with unmatched brackets
define match ~$["(" syll* "("] .o. ~$[")" syll* ")"] .o. ~[?* "(" syll*] .o. ~[syll* ")" ?*] ;

# randomly assign stress
define stress x (->) X .o. l (->) L .o. c (->) C .o. s (->) S .o. r (->) R .o. d (->) D .o. m (->) M .o. t (->) T .o. m (->) R .o. t (->) D .o. r (->) M .o. d (->) T .o. t (->) d .o. d (->) t .o. r (->) m .o. m (->) r;

# stress must occur within feet
# in fact stress must occur at the edges of feet
# this formulation also rules out feet with 2 stresses
define stressfeet [ssyll => "(" _] | [ssyll => _ ")"] ;

# no feet without stress in them
define unfeet ~$["(" usyll* ")"];

# whole thing now
define gen left .o. right .o. match .o. stress .o. stressfeet .o. unfeet;

read regex gen;

# pattern for "emphasis" is "cxc"
apply down < input
